Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3526
Code of practice; board; powers and duties.

(1) The Legislature finds and declares that a code of practice established by the board by which the members could govern their professional conduct would be beneficial to the state and would safeguard the life, health, and property of the citizens of this state.

(2) The code of practice may include provisions on:

(a) Professional competence;

(b) Conflict of interest;

(c) Full disclosure of financial interest;

(d) Full disclosure of matters affecting public safety, health, and welfare;

(e) Compliance with laws;

(f) Professional conduct and good character standards; and

(g) Practice of geology.

(3) The board may establish such code of practice through rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the board.

(4) The board may publish commentaries regarding the code of practice. Such commentaries shall explain the meaning of interpretations given to the code by the board.

(5) The board may place on probation, suspend, or revoke a professional geologist's licensure for a violation of the code of practice.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 74;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 21.